Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.08.540

Court-ordered indemnification.

Unless a corporation's articles of incorporation provide otherwise, a director of a corporation who is a party to a proceeding may apply for indemnification or advance of expenses to the court conducting the proceeding or to another court of competent jurisdiction. On receipt of an application, the court after giving any notice the court considers necessary may order indemnification or advance of expenses if it determines:

(1) The director is entitled to mandatory indemnification under RCW 23B.08.520, in which case the court shall also order the corporation to pay the director's reasonable expenses incurred to obtain court-ordered indemnification;

(2) The director is fairly and reasonably entitled to indemnification in view of all the relevant circumstances, whether or not the director met the standard of conduct set forth in RCW 23B.08.510 or was adjudged liable as described in RCW 23B.08.510(4), but if the director was adjudged so liable the director's indemnification is limited to reasonable expenses incurred unless the articles of incorporation or a bylaw, contract, or resolution approved or ratified by the shareholders pursuant to RCW 23B.08.560 provides otherwise; or

(3) In the case of an advance of expenses, the director is entitled pursuant to the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or any applicable resolution or contract, to payment or reimbursement of the director's reasonable expenses incurred as a party to the proceeding in advance of final disposition of the proceeding.

[ 1989 c 165 s 109.]